Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.130

Challenges to plan.

After the plan takes effect as provided in RCW 44.05.100, any registered voter may file a petition with the supreme court challenging the plan. After a modification to the redistricting plan takes effect as provided in RCW 44.05.120, any registered voter may file a petition with the supreme court challenging the amended plan. The court may consolidate any or all petitions and shall give all such petitions precedence over all other matters.

[ 1983 c 16 s 13.]